test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-jalg46_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - jalg: # Noun (46) jalg 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     jalg+N+Sg+Nom: jalg
     jalg+N+Sg+Gen: jala
     jalg+N+Sg+Par: jalga
     jalg+N+Sg+Ill: jalga
     jalg+N+Sg+Ine: [jalan, jalah, jalahn]
     jalg+N+Sg+Ela: jalast
     jalg+N+Sg+All: jalalõ
     jalg+N+Sg+Ade: jalal
     jalg+N+Sg+Abl: jalalt
     jalg+N+Sg+Tra: jalas
     jalg+N+Sg+Ter: jalaniq
     jalg+N+Sg+Abe: jalaldaq
     jalg+N+Sg+Com: jalagaq
     jalg+N+Pl+Nom: jalaq
     jalg+N+Pl+Gen: jalgo
     jalg+N+Pl+Par: jalgo
     jalg+N+Pl+Ill: [jalgohe, jalgo, jalgodõ]
     jalg+N+Pl+Ine: [jalon, jaloh, jalohn]
     jalg+N+Pl+Ela: jalost
     jalg+N+Pl+All: jalolõ
     jalg+N+Pl+Ade: jalol
     jalg+N+Pl+Abl: jalolt
     jalg+N+Pl+Tra: jalos
     jalg+N+Pl+Ter: jaloniq
     jalg+N+Pl+Abe: jaloldaq
     jalg+N+Pl+Com: jalgogaq
